Virginia statutes. Title 50. Partnerships.
Article 6. Distributions and Withdrawal.

§ 50-73.36.
Interim distributions.

Except as provided in this article, a partner is entitled to receive distributions from a limited partnership before the dissolution and winding up thereof to the extent and at the times or upon the happening of the events specified in the partnership agreement.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 1997, c. 188.

The 1997 amendment

deleted “his withdrawal from the limited partnership and before” preceding “the dissolution.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Partnership, § 99.

§ 50-73.37.
Withdrawal of general partner.

A general partner may withdraw from a limited partnership at any time by giving written notice to the other partners, but if the withdrawal violates the partnership agreement, the limited partnership may recover from the withdrawing general partner damages for breach of the partnership agreement and offset the damages against the amount otherwise distributable to him in addition to any remedies otherwise available under applicable law.

History.

1985, c. 607.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Partnership, § 97.

§ 50-73.38.
Withdrawal of limited partner.

A limited partner may withdraw from a limited partnership only at the time or upon the happening of events specified in writing in the partnership agreement.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 1997, c. 188.

The 1997 amendment

inserted “only” following “limited partnership” and deleted the former second sentence which read: “If the agreement does not specify in writing the time or the events upon the happening of which a limited partner may withdraw or a definite time for the dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership, a limited partner may withdraw upon not less than six months’ prior written notice to each general partner at his address on the books of the limited partnership at its specified office required to be maintained by §

50-73.4

.”

Law Review.

For annual survey essay, “Partnership Derivative Suits: Jennings, v. Kay Jennings Family Ltd. Partnership,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 167 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Partnership, § 94.3.

§ 50-73.39.
Repealed by Acts 1997, c. 188.

§ 50-73.39:1.
No right to distribution upon withdrawal.

Except as otherwise provided in writing in the partnership agreement, neither a general partner nor a limited partner has any right to receive any distribution on account of (i) the partner’s withdrawal or (ii) other event of dissolution or ceasing, for any other reason, to be partner.

History.

2000, c. 581.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Partnership, §§ 94.3, 97, 99.

§ 50-73.40.
Distribution in kind.

Except as provided in writing in the partnership agreement, a partner, regardless of the nature of his contribution, has no right to demand and receive any distribution from a limited partnership in any form other than cash. Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner may not be compelled to accept a distribution of any asset in kind from a limited partnership to the extent that the percentage of the asset distributed to him exceeds a percentage of that asset which is equal to the percentage in which he shares in distributions from the limited partnership.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702.

§ 50-73.41.
Right to distribution.

At the time a partner becomes entitled to receive a distribution, he has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited partnership with respect to the distribution.

History.

1985, c. 607.

§ 50-73.42.
Limitations on distribution.

A partner may not receive a distribution from a limited partnership to the extent that, after giving effect to the distribution, all liabilities of the limited partnership, other than liabilities to partners on account of their partnership interests, exceed the fair value of the partnership assets.

History.

1985, c. 607.

§ 50-73.43.
Liability upon return of contribution.

If a partner has received the return of any part of his contribution without violation of the partnership agreement or this chapter, he is liable to the limited partnership for a period of one year thereafter for the amount of the returned contribution, but only to the extent necessary to discharge the limited partnership’s liabilities to creditors who extended credit to the limited partnership during the period the contribution was held by the partnership.

If a partner has received the return of any part of his contribution in violation of the partnership agreement or this chapter, he is liable to the limited partnership for a period of six years thereafter for the amount of the contribution wrongfully returned.

A partner receives a return of his contribution to the extent that a distribution to him reduces his share of the fair value of the net assets of the limited partnership below the value, as set forth in the partnership records to be kept pursuant to §

50-73.8

, of his contribution which has not been distributed to him.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Partnership, § 94.1.